Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.585

Washington background check advisory board.

(1) There is created the Washington background check advisory board. The board shall consist of the following members, appointed by the governor:

(a) The chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee;

(b) The executive director of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs or the executive director's designee;

(c) One sheriff;

(d) One police chief;

(e) One person engaged in the business of lawfully selling firearms at retail in this state who holds a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a); and

(f) One member of the general public.

(2) The primary purpose of the board is to ensure that the Washington state patrol *firearms background check unit established in RCW 43.43.580 is administered efficiently and effectively, and in a manner that honors individual firearms rights while preventing prohibited persons from obtaining firearms.

(3) The board shall initially convene within ninety days of June 11, 2020, and shall meet not less than monthly until such time that the Washington state patrol deems the *firearms background check unit is operational. After the Washington state patrol deems the *firearms background check unit is operational, the board shall meet quarterly, unless the board has no business to conduct during that quarter.

(4) The board shall elect from among its membership a chairperson and other such officers from among its membership as it deems appropriate.

(5) Members of the board shall serve terms of four years each on a staggered schedule to be established by the first board. For purposes of initiating a staggered schedule of terms, some members of the first board may initially serve two years and some members may initially serve four years.

(6) The board shall:

(a) Provide input and feedback regarding the establishment and operation of the *firearms background check unit established in RCW 43.43.580;

(b) Provide input on the development of the *firearms background check unit budget prior to its formal submission to the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030;

(c) Be consulted with prior to the proposal of any rule relating to the *firearms background check unit and prior to the adoption of any rule relating to the *firearms background check unit;

(d) Require reports from the chief of the Washington state patrol on matters pertaining to the *firearms background check unit; and

(e) Report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on or before December 31st of each year on the activities of the board and the *firearms background check unit for the preceding fiscal year.

(7) Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(8) The Washington state patrol shall provide the staffing and budgetary resources necessary for the board to properly fulfill its duties.

(9) Members serving in their official capacity on the Washington background check advisory board, or either their employer or employers or other entity that selected the members to serve, are immune from a civil action based on an act performed in good faith.

[ 2020 c 28 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "firearms background check unit" was changed to the "firearms background check program" by 2024 c 289 s 7.